ext/spell/ar.aff
FLAG	long
#أنتن	
SFX	E3	Y	4	
SFX	E3	ن	نه/EcEgEkEoEsh0b0c0i0X0	ن
SFX	E3	ى	ينه/EcEgEkEoEsh0b0c0i0X0	ى
SFX	E3	ي	ينه/EcEgEkEoEsh0b0c0i0X0	ي
SFX	E3	0	نه/EcEgEkEoEsh0b0c0i0X0	[^نيى]
	
#هو	
SFX	E4	Y	5	
SFX	E4	ى	يه/EdEhElEpEth0b0c0d0e0f0g0i0X0	ى
SFX	E4	ي	اه/EdEhElEpEth0b0c0d0e0f0g0i0X0	ي
SFX	E4	ى	ه/EdEth0b0c0d0e0f0g0i0X0	ى
SFX	E4	ي	ه/EdEth0b0c0d0e0f0g0i0X0	ي
SFX	E4	0	ه/EdEhElEpEth0b0c0d0e0f0g0i0X0	[^يى]
	
#هو	
SFX	E&	Y	1	
SFX	E&	0	ه/EdEth0b0c0d0e0f0g0i0X0	.
	
#هي	
SFX	E5	Y	5	
SFX	E5	ى	يه/EcEgEkEoEsh0b0c0d0e0f0g0i0X0	ى
SFX	E5	ي	اه/EcEgEkEoEsh0b0c0d0e0f0g0i0X0	ي
SFX	E5	ى	ه/EcEsh0b0c0d0e0f0g0i0X0	ى
SFX	E5	ي	ه/EcEsh0b0c0d0e0f0g0i0X0	ي
SFX	E5	0	ه/EcEgEkEoEsh0b0c0d0e0f0g0i0X0	[^يى]
	
#هي	
SFX	E$	Y	1	
SFX	E$	0	ه/EcEqh0b0c0d0e0f0g0i0X0	.
	
#هما	
SFX	E6	Y	12	
SFX	E6	ى	يانه/EdEhElh0a0b0c0d0e0f0g0i0X0	ى
SFX	E6	ي	يانه/EdEhElh0a0b0c0d0e0f0g0i0X0	ي
SFX	E6	0	انه/EdEhElh0a0b0c0d0e0f0g0i0X0	[^يى]
SFX	E6	ى	ياه/EdEpEth0a0b0c0d0e0f0g0i0X0	ى
SFX	E6	ي	ياه/EdEpEth0a0b0c0d0e0f0g0i0X0	ي
SFX	E6	0	اه/EdEpEth0a0b0c0d0e0f0g0i0X0	[^يى]
SFX	E6	ى	يانه/EcEgEkh0b0c0d0e0f0g0i0X0	ى
SFX	E6	ي	يانه/EcEgEkh0b0c0d0e0f0g0i0X0	ي
SFX	E6	0	انه/EcEgEkh0b0c0d0e0f0g0i0X0	[^يى]
SFX	E6	ى	ياه/EcEoEsh0b0c0d0e0f0g0i0X0	ى
SFX	E6	ي	ياه/EcEoEsh0b0c0d0e0f0g0i0X0	ي
SFX	E6	0	اه/EcEoEsh0b0c0d0e0f0g0i0X0	[^يى]
	
#هم	
SFX	E7	Y	6	
SFX	E7	ى	ونه/EdEhElh0a0b0c0d0e0f0g0i0X0	ى
SFX	E7	ي	ونه/EdEhElh0a0b0c0d0e0f0g0i0X0	ي
SFX	E7	0	ونه/EdEhElh0a0b0c0d0e0f0g0i0X0	[^يى]
SFX	E7	ى	وه/EdEpEth0b0c0d0e0f0g0i0X0	ى
SFX	E7	ي	وه/EdEpEth0b0c0d0e0f0g0i0X0	ي
SFX	E7	0	وه/EdEpEth0b0c0d0e0f0g0i0X0	[^يى]
	
#هن	
SFX	E8	Y	4	
SFX	E8	ن	نه/EdEhElEpEth0b0c0d0e0f0g0i0X0	ن
SFX	E8	ى	ينه/EdEhElEpEth0b0c0d0e0f0g0i0X0	ى
SFX	E8	ي	ينه/EdEhElEpEth0b0c0d0e0f0g0i0X0	ي
SFX	E8	0	نه/EdEhElEpEth0b0c0d0e0f0g0i0X0	[^نيى]
	
	
#أنا-نحن-أنتَ	
SFX	F1	Y	21	
SFX	F1	أ	ؤه/FaFeFih0d0e0f0g0i0X0	أ
SFX	F1	أ	أه/FaFmFqh0d0e0f0g0i0X0	أ
SFX	F1	ئ	ؤه/FaFeFih0d0e0f0g0i0X0	ئ
SFX	F1	ئ	أه/FaFmFqh0d0e0f0g0i0X0	ئ
SFX	F1	ى	يه/FaFeFiFmFqh0d0e0f0g0i0X0	ى
SFX	F1	ى	ه/FaFqh0d0e0f0g0i0X0	ى
SFX	F1	0	ه/FaFeFiFmFqh0d0e0f0g0i0X0	[^أئى]
SFX	F1	أ	ؤه/FbFfFjh0d0e0f0g0i0X0	أ
SFX	F1	أ	أه/FbFnFrh0d0e0f0g0i0X0	أ
SFX	F1	ئ	ؤه/FbFfFjh0d0e0f0g0i0X0	ئ
SFX	F1	ئ	أه/FbFnFrh0d0e0f0g0i0X0	ئ
SFX	F1	ى	يه/FbFfFjFnFrh0d0e0f0g0i0X0	ى
SFX	F1	ى	ه/FbFrh0d0e0f0g0i0X0	ى
SFX	F1	0	ه/FbFfFjFnFrh0d0e0f0g0i0X0	[^أئى]
SFX	F1	أ	ؤه/FcFgFkh0b0c0i0X0	أ
SFX	F1	أ	أه/FcFoFsh0b0c0i0X0	أ
SFX	F1	ئ	ؤه/FcFgFkh0b0c0i0X0	ئ
SFX	F1	ئ	أه/FcFoFsh0b0c0i0X0	ئ
SFX	F1	ى	يه/FcFgFkFoFsh0b0c0i0X0	ى
SFX	F1	ى	ه/FcFsh0b0c0i0X0	ى
SFX	F1	0	ه/FcFgFkFoFsh0b0c0i0X0	[^أئى]
	
#أنت-أنتما-أنتم	
SFX	F2	Y	24	
SFX	F2	أ	ئينه/FcFgFkh0a0b0c0i0X0	أ
SFX	F2	ئ	ئينه/FcFgFkh0a0b0c0i0X0	ئ
SFX	F2	ى	ينه/FcFgFkh0a0b0c0i0X0	ى
SFX	F2	0	ينه/FcFgFkh0a0b0c0i0X0	[^أئى]
SFX	F2	أ	ئيه/FcFoFsh0b0c0i0X0	أ
SFX	F2	ئ	ئيه/FcFoFsh0b0c0i0X0	ئ
SFX	F2	ى	يه/FcFoFsh0b0c0i0X0	ى
SFX	F2	0	يه/FcFoFsh0b0c0i0X0	[^أئى]
SFX	F2	أ	آنه/FcFgFkh0a0b0c0i0X0	أ
SFX	F2	ئ	آنه/FcFgFkh0a0b0c0i0X0	ئ
SFX	F2	ى	يانه/FcFgFkh0a0b0c0i0X0	ى
SFX	F2	0	انه/FcFgFkh0a0b0c0i0X0	[^أئى]
SFX	F2	أ	آه/FcFoFsh0b0c0i0X0	أ
SFX	F2	ئ	آه/FcFoFsh0b0c0i0X0	ئ
SFX	F2	ى	يآه/FcFoFsh0b0c0i0X0	ى
SFX	F2	0	آه/FcFoFsh0b0c0i0X0	[^أئى]
SFX	F2	أ	ؤونه/FcFgFkh0a0b0c0i0X0	أ
SFX	F2	ئ	ؤونه/FcFgFkh0a0b0c0i0X0	ئ
SFX	F2	ى	ونه/FcFgFkh0a0b0c0i0X0	ى
SFX	F2	0	ونه/FcFgFkh0a0b0c0i0X0	[^أئى]
SFX	F2	أ	ؤوه/FcFoFsh0b0c0i0X0	أ
SFX	F2	ئ	ؤوه/FcFoFsh0b0c0i0X0	ئ
SFX	F2	ى	وه/FcFoFsh0b0c0i0X0	ى
SFX	F2	0	وه/FcFoFsh0b0c0i0X0	[^أئى]
	
#أنتن	
SFX	F3	Y	5	
SFX	F3	ن	نه/FcFgFkFoFsh0b0c0i0X0	ن
SFX	F3	أ	أنه/FcFgFkFoFsh0b0c0i0X0	أ
SFX	F3	ئ	أنه/FcFgFkFoFsh0b0c0i0X0	ئ
SFX	F3	ى	ينه/FcFgFkFoFsh0b0c0i0X0	ى
SFX	F3	0	نه/FcFgFkFoFsh0b0c0i0X0	[^نأئى]
	
#هو	
SFX	F4	Y	7	
SFX	F4	أ	ؤه/FdFhFlh0b0c0d0e0f0g0i0X0	أ
SFX	F4	أ	أه/FdFpFth0b0c0d0e0f0g0i0X0	أ
SFX	F4	ئ	ؤه/FdFhFlh0b0c0d0e0f0g0i0X0	ئ
SFX	F4	ئ	أه/FdFpFth0b0c0d0e0f0g0i0X0	ئ
SFX	F4	ى	يه/FdFhFlFpFth0b0c0d0e0f0g0i0X0	ى
SFX	F4	ى	ه/FdFth0b0c0d0e0f0g0i0X0	ى
SFX	F4	0	ه/FdFhFlFpFth0b0c0d0e0f0g0i0X0	[^أئى]
	
#هي	
SFX	F5	Y	7	
SFX	F5	أ	ؤه/FcFgFkh0b0c0d0e0f0g0i0X0	أ
SFX	F5	أ	أه/FcFoFsh0b0c0d0e0f0g0i0X0	أ
SFX	F5	ئ	ؤه/FcFgFkh0b0c0d0e0f0g0i0X0	ئ
SFX	F5	ئ	أه/FcFoFsh0b0c0d0e0f0g0i0X0	ئ
SFX	F5	ى	يه/FcFgFkFoFsh0b0c0d0e0f0g0i0X0	ى
SFX	F5	ى	ه/FcFsh0b0c0d0e0f0g0i0X0	ى
SFX	F5	0	ه/FcFgFkFoFsh0b0c0d0e0f0g0i0X0	[^أئى]
	
#هما	
SFX	F6	Y	16	
SFX	F6	أ	آنه/FdFhFlh0a0b0c0d0e0f0g0i0X0	أ
SFX	F6	ئ	آنه/FdFhFlh0a0b0c0d0e0f0g0i0X0	ئ
SFX	F6	ى	يانه/FdFhFlh0a0b0c0d0e0f0g0i0X0	ى
SFX	F6	0	انه/FdFhFlh0a0b0c0d0e0f0g0i0X0	[^أئى]
SFX	F6	أ	آه/FdFpFth0b0c0d0e0f0g0i0X0	أ
SFX	F6	ئ	آه/FdFpFth0b0c0d0e0f0g0i0X0	ئ
SFX	F6	ى	يآه/FdFpFth0b0c0d0e0f0g0i0X0	ى
SFX	F6	0	آه/FdFpFth0b0c0d0e0f0g0i0X0	[^أئى]
SFX	F6	أ	آنه/FcFgFkh0a0b0c0d0e0f0g0i0X0	أ
SFX	F6	ئ	آنه/FcFgFkh0a0b0c0d0e0f0g0i0X0	ئ
SFX	F6	ى	يانه/FcFgFkh0a0b0c0d0e0f0g0i0X0	ى
SFX	F6	0	انه/FcFgFkh0a0b0c0d0e0f0g0i0X0	[^أئى]
SFX	F6	أ	آه/FcFoFsh0b0c0d0e0f0g0i0X0	أ
SFX	F6	ئ	آه/FcFoFsh0b0c0d0e0f0g0i0X0	ئ
SFX	F6	ى	يآه/FcFoFsh0b0c0d0e0f0g0i0X0	ى
SFX	F6	0	آه/FcFoFsh0b0c0d0e0f0g0i0X0	[^أئى]
	
#هم	
SFX	F7	Y	8	
SFX	F7	أ	ؤونه/FdFhFlh0a0b0c0d0e0f0g0i0X0	أ
SFX	F7	ئ	ؤونه/FdFhFlh0a0b0c0d0e0f0g0i0X0	ئ
SFX	F7	ى	ونه/FdFhFlh0a0b0c0d0e0f0g0i0X0	ى
SFX	F7	0	ونه/FdFhFlh0a0b0c0d0e0f0g0i0X0	[^أئى]
SFX	F7	أ	ؤوه/FdFpFth0b0c0d0e0f0g0i0X0	أ
SFX	F7	ئ	ؤوه/FdFpFth0b0c0d0e0f0g0i0X0	ئ
SFX	F7	ى	وه/FdFpFth0b0c0d0e0f0g0i0X0	ى
SFX	F7	0	وه/FdFpFth0b0c0d0e0f0g0i0X0	[^أئى]
	
#هن	
SFX	F8	Y	5	
SFX	F8	ن	نه/FdFhFlFpFth0b0c0d0e0f0g0i0X0	ن
SFX	F8	أ	أنه/FdFhFlFpFth0b0c0d0e0f0g0i0X0	أ
SFX	F8	ئ	أنه/FdFhFlFpFth0b0c0d0e0f0g0i0X0	ئ
SFX	F8	ى	ينه/FdFhFlFpFth0b0c0d0e0f0g0i0X0	ى
SFX	F8	0	نه/FdFhFlFpFth0b0c0d0e0f0g0i0X0	[^نأئى]
	
	
#أنا-نحن-أنتَ	
SFX	G1	Y	63	
SFX	G1	أ	ؤه/AaAeAiAmAqh0d0e0f0g0i0X0	أ
SFX	G1	اء	اؤه/AaAeAih0d0e0f0g0i0X0	اء
SFX	G1	اء	اءه/AaAmAqh0d0e0f0g0i0X0	اء
SFX	G1	آ	آه/AaAeAiAmAqh0d0e0f0g0i0X0	آ
SFX	G1	ا	اه/AaAeAiAmAqh0d0e0f0g0i0X0	[^ي]ا
SFX	G1	ا	اه/AaAeAiAmAqh0d0e0f0g0i0X0	يا
SFX	G1	ى	اه/AaAeAiAmAqh0d0e0f0g0i0X0	[^أء]ى
SFX	G1	ي	يه/AaAeAiAmAqh0d0e0f0g0i0X0	ي
SFX	G1	ءى	ءاه/AaAeAiAmAqh0d0e0f0g0i0X0	ءى
SFX	G1	أى	آه/AaAeAiAmAqh0d0e0f0g0i0X0	[ت]أى
SFX	G1	أى	آه/AaAeAiAmAqh0d0e0f0g0i0X0	[^ت]أى
SFX	G1	اء	أه/AaAqh0d0e0f0g0i0X0	اء
SFX	G1	آ	أه/AaAqh0d0e0f0g0i0X0	آ
SFX	G1	ا	ه/AaAqh0d0e0f0g0i0X0	[^ي]ا
SFX	G1	ا	ه/AaAqh0d0e0f0g0i0X0	يا
SFX	G1	ى	ه/AaAqh0d0e0f0g0i0X0	[^أء]ى
SFX	G1	ي	ه/AaAqh0d0e0f0g0i0X0	ي
SFX	G1	ءى	ءه/AaAqh0d0e0f0g0i0X0	ءى
SFX	G1	أى	أه/AaAqh0d0e0f0g0i0X0	[ت]أى
SFX	G1	أى	ئه/AaAqh0d0e0f0g0i0X0	[^ت]أى
SFX	G1	0	ه/AaAeAiAmAqh0d0e0f0g0i0X0	[^أءاآيى]
SFX	G1	أ	ؤه/AbAfAjAnArh0d0e0f0g0i0X0	أ
SFX	G1	اء	اؤه/AbAfAjh0d0e0f0g0i0X0	اء
SFX	G1	اء	اءه/AbAnArh0d0e0f0g0i0X0	اء
SFX	G1	آ	آه/AbAfAjAnArh0d0e0f0g0i0X0	آ
SFX	G1	ا	اه/AbAfAjAnArh0d0e0f0g0i0X0	[^ي]ا
SFX	G1	ا	اه/AbAfAjAnArh0d0e0f0g0i0X0	يا
SFX	G1	ى	اه/AbAfAjAnArh0d0e0f0g0i0X0	[^أء]ى
SFX	G1	ي	يه/AbAfAjAnArh0d0e0f0g0i0X0	ي
SFX	G1	ءى	ءاه/AbAfAjAnArh0d0e0f0g0i0X0	ءى
SFX	G1	أى	آه/AbAfAjAnArh0d0e0f0g0i0X0	[ت]أى
SFX	G1	أى	آه/AbAfAjAnArh0d0e0f0g0i0X0	[^ت]أى
SFX	G1	اء	أه/AbArh0d0e0f0g0i0X0	اء
SFX	G1	آ	أه/AbArh0d0e0f0g0i0X0	آ
SFX	G1	ا	ه/AbArh0d0e0f0g0i0X0	[^ي]ا
SFX	G1	ا	ه/AbArh0d0e0f0g0i0X0	يا
SFX	G1	ى	ه/AbArh0d0e0f0g0i0X0	[^أء]ى
SFX	G1	ي	ه/AbArh0d0e0f0g0i0X0	ي
SFX	G1	ءى	ءه/AbArh0d0e0f0g0i0X0	ءى
SFX	G1	أى	أه/AbArh0d0e0f0g0i0X0	[ت]أى
SFX	G1	أى	ئه/AbArh0d0e0f0g0i0X0	[^ت]أى
SFX	G1	0	ه/AbAfAjAnArh0d0e0f0g0i0X0	[^أءاآيى]
SFX	G1	أ	ؤه/AcAgAkAoAsh0b0c0i0X0	أ
SFX	G1	اء	اؤه/AcAgAkh0b0c0i0X0	اء
SFX	G1	اء	اءه/AcAoAsh0b0c0i0X0	اء
SFX	G1	آ	آه/AcAgAkAoAsh0b0c0i0X0	آ
SFX	G1	ا	اه/AcAgAkAoAsh0b0c0i0X0	[^ي]ا
SFX	G1	ا	اه/AcAgAkAoAsh0b0c0i0X0	يا
SFX	G1	ى	اه/AcAgAkAoAsh0b0c0i0X0	[^أء]ى
SFX	G1	ي	يه/AcAgAkAoAsh0b0c0i0X0	ي
SFX	G1	ءى	ءاه/AcAgAkAoAsh0b0c0i0X0	ءى
SFX	G1	أى	آه/AcAgAkAoAsh0b0c0i0X0	[ت]أى
SFX	G1	أى	آه/AcAgAkAoAsh0b0c0i0X0	[^ت]أى
SFX	G1	اء	أه/AcAsh0b0c0i0X0	اء
SFX	G1	آ	أه/AcAsh0b0c0i0X0	آ
SFX	G1	ا	ه/AcAsh0b0c0i0X0	[^ي]ا
SFX	G1	ا	ه/AcAsh0b0c0i0X0	يا
SFX	G1	ى	ه/AcAsh0b0c0i0X0	[^أء]ى
SFX	G1	ي	ه/AcAsh0b0c0i0X0	ي
SFX	G1	ءى	ءه/AcAsh0b0c0i0X0	ءى
SFX	G1	أى	أه/AcAsh0b0c0i0X0	[ت]أى
SFX	G1	أى	ئه/AcAsh0b0c0i0X0	[^ت]أى
SFX	G1	0	ه/AcAgAkAoAsh0b0c0i0X0	[^أءاآيى]
	
